Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.230

Secretary of state as chief election officer.

The secretary of state through the election division shall be the chief election officer for all federal, state, county, city, town, and district elections that are subject to this title. The secretary of state shall keep records of elections held for which he or she is required by law to canvass the results, make such records available to the public upon request, and coordinate those state election activities required by federal law.

[ 2003 c 111 s 137; 1994 c 57 s 4; 1965 c 9 s 29.04.070. Prior: 1963 c 200 s 23; 1949 c 161 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 5147-2. Formerly RCW 29.04.070.]

NOTES:

Severability—1994 c 57: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.